Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4064.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 6c. (1) A member of the Michigan senate or house of representatives shall not receive compensation, other than that provided by law for a member of the Michigan senate or house of representatives, for communicating directly with any of the following for the purpose of influencing legislative or administrative action: (a) An official in the executive branch. (b) An official in the legislative branch. (c) An official in the executive branch of any other government. (d) An official in the legislative branch of any other government. (2) An individual who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect January 1, 2027. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor